District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-5201

“Gift enterprise” defined.

Omitted.

History

Leg. Assem., Aug. 23, 1871, p. 96, ch. 69, § 21

Editor's Notes

This section was omitted because §§ 22-5202 and 22-5203 were repealed in 1961 making § 22-5201 obsolete.